Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4893.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.345, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Definitions. (a) For the purpose of section 168.021 and this section, the following terms have the meanings given them in this subdivision. (b) "Health professional" means a licensed physician, licensed physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, licensed physical therapist, or licensed chiropractor. (c) "Long-term certificate" means a certificate issued for a period greater than 12 months but not greater than 71 months. (d) "Organization certificate" means a certificate issued to an entity other than a natural person for a period of three years. (e) "Permit" refers to a permit that is issued for a period of 30 days, in lieu of the certificate referred to in subdivision 3, while the application is being processed. (f) "Physically disabled person" means a person who: (1) because of disability cannot walk without significant risk of falling; (2) because of disability cannot walk 200 feet without stopping to rest; (3) because of disability cannot walk without the aid of another person, a walker, a cane, crutches, braces, a prosthetic device, or a wheelchair; (4) is restricted by a respiratory disease to such an extent that the person's forced (respiratory) expiratory volume for one second, when measured by spirometry, is less than one liter; (5) has an arterial oxygen tension (PaO2) of less than 60 mm/Hg on room air at rest; (6) uses portable oxygen; (7) has a cardiac condition to the extent that the person's functional limitations are classified in severity as class III or class IV according to standards set by the American Heart Association; (8) has lost an arm or a leg and does not have or cannot use an artificial limb; (9) has a disability that would be aggravated by walking 200 feet under normal environmental conditions to an extent that would be life threatening; or (10) is legally blind. (g) A pregnant personnew text begin or a postpartum person within 45 days of giving birthnew text end experiencing any of the conditions described in paragraph (f) is eligible for parking privileges pursuant to this section. (h) "Short-term certificate" means a certificate issued for a period greater than six months but not greater than 12 months. (i) "Six-year certificate" means a certificate issued for a period of six years. (j) "Temporary certificate" means a certificate issued for a period not greater than six months. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.346, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Disability parking space signsnew text begin ; pavement markingsnew text end . (a) Parking spaces reserved for physically disabled persons must be designated and identified by the posting of signs incorporating the international symbol of access in white on blue and indicating that violators are subject to a fine of up to $200. These parking spaces are reserved for disabled persons with motor vehicles displaying the required certificate, plates, permit valid for 30 days, or insignia. (b) For purposes of this subdivision, a parking space that is clearly identified as reserved for physically disabled persons by a permanently posted sign that does not meet all design standards, is considered designated and reserved for physically disabled persons. A sign posted for the purpose of this section must be visible from inside a motor vehicle parked in the space, be kept clear of snow or other obstructions which block its visibility, and be nonmovable. new text begin (c) All accessible parking spaces and associated access aisles must be clearly marked and visible on paved surfaces under dry conditions. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d) new text end By August 1, 2024, the Minnesota Council on Disability must select and propose a statewide uniform disability parking space sign that is consistent with the Americans with Disabilities Act. The selected and proposed sign must not display any variation of the word "handicapped." As part of selecting and proposing a statewide uniform disability parking space sign, the Minnesota Council on Disability may encourage owners or managers of property to replace existing disability parking space signs at the owner's earliest opportunity once the sign is made available for distribution. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e) new text end Beginning on August 1, 2025, an applicable owner or manager of property on which a disability parking sign may be located must install and display the new uniform disability parking sign required in paragraph deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d) new text end at: (1) newly created on-site parking facilities; and (2) existing on-site parking facilities when the manager or owner replaces existing disability parking space signs. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.346, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Parking space free of obstruction; penalty. The owner or manager of the property on which the designated parking space is located must ensure that the parking space and associated access aisle are kept free of obstruction. If the owner or manager does not have the parking space properly posted or knowingly allows the parking space or access aisle to be blockednew text begin or obstructednew text end by deleted text begin ploweddeleted text end snow,new text begin ice,new text end merchandise, or similar obstructions, the owner or manager is guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine of up to $500new text begin per day the obstruction existsnew text end . Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.346, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. deleted text begin Local ordinance;deleted text end Citizen enforcement program. new text begin (a) new text end A statutory or home rule charter city may, by ordinance,new text begin and the commissioner, in collaboration with the Minnesota Council on Disability, mustnew text end establish a program to enforce the parking restrictions of this section or any similar local ordinance, relating to parking spaces for the physically disabled, by using citizen volunteers to issue citations to violators. The ordinance deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin and statewide program mustnew text end contain a process for training program participants in the requirements of the law, the method of issuing citations, and other related matters. Program participants who satisfy the training requirements of the ordinance are authorized to issue citations for violations of this section and are exempt from any other training or licensure requirements imposed on law enforcement officers by chapter 626. new text begin (b) In collaboration with the Minnesota Council on Disability, the commissioner must establish a digital reporting portal on the department's website to allow citizens to report disability parking space violations. new text end new text begin (c) A $25 surcharge is added to all fines paid pursuant to citizen citations issued under this subdivision. Of the amounts paid pursuant to citizen citations issued pursuant to the statewide program under paragraph (a), 50 percent is transferred to the agency administering the citation and the remaining 50 percent is deposited in the accessible parking citizen enforcement program account, which is established in the special revenue fund. Money in the account is annually appropriated first to the commissioner for administration of the account funds. The remaining money is annually appropriated to the Minnesota Council on Disability for accessible parking awareness, education, marketing, and grants for expanding disability parking space accessibility across the state. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin ACCESSIBLE PARKING CITIZEN ENFORCEMENT PROGRAM; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation to implement the accessible parking citizen enforcement program established under Minnesota Statutes, section 169.346, subdivision 4. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) $75,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the Minnesota Council on Disability to coordinate with the commissioner of transportation in operating, and to raise awareness of, the accessible parking citizen enforcement program established under Minnesota Statutes, section 169.346, subdivision 4. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin ACCESSIBLE PARKING SPACES; RULEMAKING.new text end new text begin (a) The Department of Labor and Industry must amend Minnesota Rules, part 1341.0502, to require at least ten percent of all parking spaces to be disability parking spaces. The ten-percent standard must apply to new and resurfaced or repainted parking lots beginning July 1, 2027, and all parking lots by June 30, 2031. new text end new text begin (b) The Department of Labor and Industry must amend Minnesota Rules, part 1341.0502, subpart 2, to require signs marking access aisles to include a warning that unauthorized parking in an access aisle is subject to the fines and penalties under Minnesota Statutes, section 169.346. new text end new text begin (c) The Department of Labor and Industry may use the good cause exemption under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.388, in adopting rules required under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end